Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 6 Committees and Staff

22-6-1.
Deputy sheriffs in attendance.

The number of deputy sheriffs who shall attend upon the general assembly, at any session of it, shall not exceed three (3) in both chambers, unless by special order of the general assembly.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 34; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 36; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

22-6-1

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 52.

22-6-2.
Committee clerks.

The chairperson of each of the committees on judiciary, corporations, special legislation, finance, labor, and health, education, and welfare of the senate and the committees on health, education and welfare, judiciary, corporations, special legislation, finance, and labor of the house of representatives, and the joint committee on accounts and claims may each employ a clerk, and the clerk of the latter committee shall be ex-officio clerk of the joint committee on law revision. In addition, the speaker of the house of representatives may appoint a deputy clerk to assist the recording clerk and in the absence of the recording clerk to perform the duties of the recording clerk as deputy and in the absence of the reading clerk to perform the duties of the reading clerk as deputy. The deputy clerk shall receive a sum in full payment for all services rendered at any regular session of the general assembly as determined and set by the joint committee on legislative services.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 38; P.L. 1917, ch. 1460, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 39; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 39; P.L. 1945, ch. 1537, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1669, § 1; P.L. 1949, ch. 2158, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2652, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3411, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

22-6-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 237, § 2; P.L. 1967, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 164, § 1.

22-6-2.1.
Subpoena power.

The standing committees of the house of representatives as established by the rules of the house of representatives and the standing committees of the senate as established by the rules of the senate shall in the performance of their duties have the power upon majority vote of the committee members present and with the written approval of the speaker for committees of the house and with the written approval of the president of the senate for committees of the senate to issue witness subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, and orders for the production of books, accounts, papers, records, and documents which shall be signed and issued by the chairperson of the committee, or a person serving in his or her capacity, and shall be returnable to the chairperson. All subpoenas and orders shall be served as subpoenas in civil cases in the superior court are now served, and witnesses so subpoenaed shall be entitled to the same fees for attendance and travel as now provided for witnesses in civil cases in the superior court. If the person subpoenaed to attend before the committee fails to obey the command of the subpoena without reasonable cause, or refuses to be sworn, or to be examined, or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or if any person shall refuse to produce books, accounts, papers, records, and documents material to the issue, set forth in an order duly served on that person, the committee by majority vote of the committee members present may apply to any justice of the superior court, for any county, upon proof by affidavit of the fact, for a rule or order returnable in not less than two (2) nor more than five (5) days, directing the person to show cause before the justice who made the order or any other justice described above why he or she should not be adjudged in contempt. Upon the return of the orders the justice before whom the matter is brought on for hearing shall examine under oath that person, and the person shall be given an opportunity to be heard, and if the justice shall determine that the person has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or to produce books, accounts, papers, records, and documents material to the issue which he or she was ordered to bring or produce, the justice may immediately commit the offender to the adult correctional institutions, there to remain until he or she submits to do the act which he or she was required to do, or is discharged according to law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 23.

22-6-2.2.
Immunity of witnesses in impeachment proceedings.

In the case of any individual who has been or may be called to testify or provide other information at any proceeding in connection with any resolution of impeachment or impeachment trial before either house of the general assembly, or any committee, or any subcommittee of either house, the presiding justice of the superior court shall issue, in accordance with subsections (b) and (c) of this section, upon the request of a duly authorized representative of the house of the general assembly or the committee concerned, an order requiring that individual to give testimony or provide other information which he or she refuses to give or provide on the basis of the privilege against self-incrimination.

Before issuing an order under subsection (a) of this section, the presiding justice shall find that:

In the case of a proceeding before either house of the general assembly, the request for the order has been approved by an affirmative vote of a majority of the members present of that house;

In the case of a proceeding before a committee or a subcommittee of either house of the general assembly, the request for the order has been approved by an affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the full committee and obtained the written approval of the speaker, for committees of the house, or written approval of the president of the senate, for committees of the senate; and

Five (5) days or more prior to the day on which the request for the order was made, the attorney general was served with notice of an intention to request the order.

The presiding justice, after notice to the witness, shall order the witness to answer all questions put to him or her or produce the evidence. The witness may not refuse to comply with the order on the basis of his or her privilege against self-incrimination; but the witness shall not be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for, or on account of, any transaction or matter regarding which, in accordance with the order, the witness gave answer or produced evidence and no testimony or other information compelled under the order or any information directly or indirectly derived from the testimony or other information shall be used against the witness in any criminal case, except he or she may be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for any perjury, false swearing, or contempt committed in answering or failing to answer, or in producing or failing to produce evidence, in accordance with the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 23.

22-6-3.
Minority clerks.

The president of the senate and the speaker of the house shall appoint, upon the nomination of the leaders of the minority party, a minority clerk in the senate and a minority clerk in the house whose pay shall be determined and set by the joint committee on legislative services.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 39; P.L. 1951, ch. 2652, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3411, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

22-6-3

; P.L. 1973, ch. 164, § 1.

22-6-4.
Deposit and filing of petitions, bills, and resolutions.

Each clerk appointed under the provisions of §§

22-6-2

and

22-6-3

, within thirty (30) calendar days after the final adjournment of the general assembly in each even-numbered year, shall deposit with the secretary of state all petitions, bills, acts, and resolutions which are on the files of the committee of which he or she is a clerk, and those petitions, bills, acts, and resolutions shall remain in the custody of the secretary of state and shall be filed in the manner that the secretary may direct; provided, that upon the request of a chairperson of any committee of any subsequent general assembly there shall be returned to the files of the respective committees the petitions, bills, acts, and resolutions as in the judgment of the chairperson are required for use by his or her committee. In like manner, the recording clerk of the house of representatives, within thirty (30) calendar days after the final adjournment of the general assembly in each even-numbered year, shall deposit with the secretary of state any bills that may be in his or her possession.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 39; P.L. 1926, ch. 806, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 40; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

22-6-4

.

22-6-5.
Compensation of reading and recording clerks.

The reading clerk of the senate, the reading clerk of the house of representatives, and the recording clerk of the house of representatives shall each receive a sum in full payment for all services rendered at any regular session of the general assembly as determined and set by the joint committee on legislative services.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 41; P.L. 1949, ch. 2364, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

22-6-5

; P.L. 1961, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 164, § 1.

22-6-6.
Compensation of special committee clerks.

The clerk of the judiciary committee, the clerk of the finance committee, the clerk of the corporations committee, the clerk of the special legislative committee, the clerk of the labor committee and the clerk of the health, education, and welfare committee of each house of the general assembly shall each receive a sum in full payment for all services rendered at any regular session of the general assembly as determined and set by the joint committee on legislative services.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 41; P.L. 1949, ch. 2364, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3411, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

22-6-6

; P.L. 1965, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 164, § 1.

22-6-7.
Compensation of roving clerks.

The additional clerks of committees to serve the other committees of the senate under the direction of the clerk of the senate and the clerks of the committees of the house under the direction of the reading clerk of the house, the “roving clerks,” so-called, shall each receive a sum in full payment for all services rendered at any regular session of the general assembly as determined and set by the joint committee on legislative services.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 41; P.L. 1949, ch. 2364, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

22-6-7

; P.L. 1965, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 164, § 1.

22-6-8.
Compensation of doorkeepers.

The head doorkeepers of the senate and the house of representatives shall each receive a sum in full payment for all services rendered at any regular session of the general assembly as determined and set by the joint committee on legislative services. The assistant doorkeepers of the senate and the house of representatives shall each receive a sum in full payment for all services rendered at any regular session of the general assembly as determined and set by the joint committee on legislative services.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 41; P.L. 1949, ch. 2364, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

22-6-8

; P.L. 1967, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 164, § 1.

22-6-9.
Compensation of pages.

The pages of the senate and the house of representatives, with the exception of the head pages of the senate and the house of representatives, and the assistant head page of the house of representatives, shall each receive a sum in full payment for all services rendered at any regular session of the general assembly as determined and set by the joint committee on legislative services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 164, § 1.

22-6-10.
Fiscal assistance for finance committee of house of representatives.

In order to properly carry out the functions of the committee on finance of the house of representatives as provided in chapter 3 of title 35, the chairperson of the committee on finance, with the approval of a majority of the members of the committee, may employ a fiscal assistant, a federal coordinator, and expert and technical assistants who shall by their experience and training be qualified in governmental, financial, and budgetary matters. In addition, the chairperson, with the approval of a majority of the members of the committee, may employ any research and secretarial assistance that shall be deemed necessary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 79, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 222, § 1.

22-6-11.
Duties of fiscal assistant.

It shall be the duty of the fiscal assistant of the committee on finance of the house of representatives, with the approval of the chairperson of the committee, to:

Review all revenues received by the state in the last complete fiscal year, together with the estimates made for that year as contained in the governor’s budget, and report, insofar as practical, on all deviations between the estimated revenues and the actual collections;

Review all expenditures, together with the regular and supplementary appropriations made for that year, and report on all deviations between the appropriations and the actual expenditures. The report shall also provide information on the quantity and quality of the services rendered for the amounts expended, and this information shall be reduced insofar as practical to an evaluation of performance based on appropriate standards and objectives;

Review the state’s indebtedness and capital improvement program;

Make recommendations for revising or amending previously enacted public and general laws involving the expenditure of public funds;

Advise the finance committee of the house of representatives on matters pertaining to the state’s finances and make recommendations for improving the operating efficiency and economy of the various departments and agencies of the state government;

Prepare and submit to the finance committee of the house of representatives and to its members following the submission of the annual budget by the governor, but prior to its enactment, an analysis of all proposed revenues and expenditures with recommendations for revisions;

Prepare and submit to the finance committee of the house of representatives an analytical report on any legislation proposing new or expanded services by the state with estimates of any costs which may be involved;

Prepare and submit to the finance committee of the house of representatives analytical reports on all proposed state bond issues with estimates of debt service and operating costs involved;

Prepare and submit reports on any aspect of the state government or its finances which the finance committee of the house of representatives may require;

Notify the finance committee of the house of representatives and the speaker of the house of representatives whenever the fiscal assistant shall determine by his or her review of the state’s revenue and expenditures that actual revenue upon which appropriations were based or that expenditures are exceeding the budget officer’s quarterly or monthly allotments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 79, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. XXVI, § 1.

22-6-11.1.
[Transferred.]

22-6-12.
Access to public records.

The committee on finance of the house of representatives shall have free access to all public records and documents in this state which may be of value to it in connection with the research and study of the committee and its staff. The committee or any member or any of its personnel may inspect the properties, equipment, facilities, and records of the various departments, commissions, boards, or agencies of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 79, art. 3, § 1.

22-6-13.
Subpoena power.

The committee on finance of the house of representatives is authorized in the performance of its duties as provided in §§

22-6-10

—

22-6-12

to require the attendance of any state employee by subpoena or otherwise and to require the production of books, papers, and documents which are necessary for its work.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 79, art. 3, § 1.

22-6-14.
Staff offices.

The committee on finance of the house of representatives shall be provided with suitable offices in the state house for its staff.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 79, art. 3, § 1.

22-6-15.
Annual appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum that shall be necessary to carry out the provisions of §§

22-6-10

—

22-6-14

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 79, art. 3, § 1.